West Virginia, session 2026, HB4891.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. Duties and Privileges of Public Utilities Subject to Regulations of Commission. §24-3-3b. Maintenance and upgrades of utility infrastructure. (a) Any business entity who provides utility services to West Virginians shall maintain the infrastructure necessary to provide said services in serviceable, working condition and shall absorb the cost of said maintenance or upgrades. (b) Any business entity performing the maintenance or upgrades described in this section shall not pass the cost burden on to customers and shall maintain records that conclusively show that these costs were not included in any justification for a rate increase or any other increased financial burden upon the customer.